Wyoming, session 2026, HB0113.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-135(a)(intro), (i), (iii), (v),
by creating new paragraphs (vi) through (viii), (b), (f)
HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340
and by creating new subsections (g) and (h) is amended to
read:

21-3-135. Parental and guardian notices related to
the educational, physical, mental and emotional health of
students; student welfare; procedures; school district
prohibitions.

(a) Each school district including school district
personnel shall:

(i) Notify a student's parent or guardian as
soon as practicable if there is a change in the student's
educational, physical, mental or emotional health or
well-being during school hours or while the student is
engaged in any activity, extracurricular activity, event,
program or function where school district personnel are
responsible for the student regardless of location.
Procedures adopted under this paragraph shall reinforce the
fundamental right of parents and guardians to make
decisions regarding the care and control of their children
by requiring school district personnel to encourage a
student to discuss issues relating to his well-being with
HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340
his parent or guardian or to facilitate discussion with the
parent or guardian;

(iii) Not adopt or implement any formal or
informal rules, policies, practices or procedures that
prohibit or discourage school district personnel from
notifying a student's parent or guardian about the
student's educational, physical, mental or emotional health
or well-being during school hours or while the student is
engaged in any activity, extracurricular activity, event,
program or function where school district personnel are
responsible for the student regardless of location or a
change in the student's related services as authorized
under paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section;

(v) Obtain written or electronic permission from
each student's parent or legal guardian not less than one
(1) day prior to the student participating or receiving
instruction in any trainings, courses or classes that
address sexual orientation, or gender identity or
diversity, equity or inclusion;.

HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340
(vi) Notify a student's parent or guardian not
less than five (5) days prior to the student attending or
participating in an assembly, extracurricular activity or
guest speaker presentation that addresses sexual
orientation, gender identity or diversity, equity or
inclusion and provide the option for the student's parent
or guardian to opt the student out of attendance or
participation;

(vii) Adopt a policy, practice or procedure to
ensure that school district personnel and students are not
required to refer to a student using the student's
preferred pronoun if the pronoun does not align with the
student's biological sex;

(viii) Adopt a policy, practice or procedure to
allow school district personnel to withdraw or opt out of
mandatory classes, lessons, trainings, educational
activities or any program or activity involving diversity,
equity or inclusion.

(b) Effective school year 2024-2025 and each school
year thereafter, at the beginning of each school year, each
HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340
school district shall make available to parents and
guardians any routine health care services offered or
provided at the student's school and provide the option for
the parent or guardian to withhold consent or decline any
routine specific health care services. Parental or guardian
consent to a routine health care service shall not waive
the parent's or guardian's right to access the student's
educational or health care records or to be notified of a
change in the student's educational, physical, mental or
emotional health or well-being during school hours or while
the student is engaged in any activity, extracurricular
activity, event, program or function where school district
personnel are responsible for the student regardless of
location. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
preventing school district personnel from rendering first
aid to a student or summoning emergency responders in case
of sudden need.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit school
districts from complying with mandatory reporting of abuse
or neglect pursuant to W.S. 14-3-205. For purposes of this
section, "abuse" means as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii)
and "neglect" means as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(vii).
HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340

(g) Effective school year 2026-2027 and each school
year thereafter, each school district shall make available
to parents and guardians and publish on the school
district's official website at the beginning of each school
year all written policies, practices and procedures and
during the school year any updates to any written policy,
practice or procedure. Each school district shall make
available to parents and guardians and publish on the
school district's official website any updates to any
written policy, practice or procedure within thirty (30)
days after the school district adopts such updates.

(h) As used in this section:

(i) "Abuse" means as defined by W.S.
14-3-202(a)(ii);

(ii) "Assembly" means a gathering of students
and school district personnel to share information and
announcements, celebrate or present achievements or awards,
promote school spirit or attend presentations from guest
speakers;
HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340

(iii) "Diversity, equity or inclusion" means any
program, activity or policy that:

(A) Promotes discriminating for or against
a person on the basis of race, color, sex, national origin
or religion;

(B) Promotes the concept that a particular
race, color, sex, national origin or religion is inherently
or systemically superior, inferior, oppressive, oppressed,
privileged or unprivileged; or

(C) Promotes gender ideology.

(iv) "Extracurricular activity" means a
voluntary activity sponsored by the public school or school
district or an organization sanctioned by the school
district. "Extracurricular activity" shall include but are
not limited to preparation for and involvement in public
performances, contests, athletic competitions,
demonstrations, displays and club activities;

HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340
(v) "Gender ideology" means the concept of
replacing the biological category of sex with an
ever-shifting concept of self-assessed gender identity
that:

(A) Permits that a biological male may
identify as a female, nonbinary or a combination of male
and female;

(B) Permits that a biological female may
identify as a male, nonbinary or a combination of male and
female;

(C) Requires other persons and institutions
to permit that a biological male may identify as a female,
nonbinary or combination of male and female or to permit
that a biological female may identify as a male, nonbinary
or combination of male and female;

(D) Recognizes that there is a vast
spectrum of genders that are disconnected from a person's
biological sex and allows for a person to be born with the
wrong biological sex.
HB0113

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0340

(vi) "Neglect" means as defined by W.S.
14-3-202(a)(vii);

(vii) "Policy, practice or procedure" includes
any written or electronic materials issued by a school
district or school district personnel that governs conduct
at a public school within a school district;

(viii) "School district personnel" means persons
employed by a school district, independent contractors
retained by a school district and volunteers who may have
contact with students in the course of volunteering for a
school district;

(ix) "School hours" means the period of time
that a student is required to be in a public school.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0113